Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1309
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, or any other business entity.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 315.